Massachusetts, session 194th, H4364.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General 
Laws or any general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset 
management and maintenance, in consultation with the adjutant general, may convey to the town 
of Bourne permanent and temporary easements in lands of the commonwealth used for armory 
purposes located on Armory road in the town of Bourne and shown on a plan on file with the 
clerk of the town of Bourne, entitled “Proposed Utility Easement Plan in Bourne, Mass. prepared 
for town of Bourne #31 Armory Road Map 19.4 Parcel 181” dated October 15, 2018 and 
prepared by Bracken Engineering, Inc. The exact boundaries of the easement areas shall be 
determined by the commissioner based upon a survey. The easements shall be granted solely for 
the purposes of installation, use, maintenance, repair and replacement of a subsurface waterline. 
The grant of the easements shall be subject to sections 2 to 4, inclusive, and such additional 

of 3 12 terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in 
consultation with the adjutant general, may reasonably require consistent with this act. 
SECTION 2. The town of Bourne shall assume all costs associated with engineering, 
surveys, appraisals, deed preparation and other expenses necessary to execute the conveyances 
authorized in this act. 
SECTION 3. Consideration for the conveyance of the easements authorized in section 1 
shall be the full and fair market value of the easements or the value in proposed use of the 
easements, whichever is greater, as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management 
and maintenance based upon an independent appraisal of the fair market value and value in use 
of the easements described in section 1, which shall be prepared in accordance with the usual and 
customary professional appraisal practices by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the 
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance. The commissioner of capital asset 
management and maintenance shall submit the appraisal to the inspector general for their review 
and comment. The inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal and the review shall 
include an examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector general shall 
prepare a report of such review and file the report with the commissioner of capital asset 
management and maintenance. After receiving the report, the commissioner shall submit copies 
of the report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on 
state administration and regulatory oversight at least 15 days prior to the execution of documents 
affecting the conveyances authorized in said section 1. 
SECTION 4. No instrument executed pursuant to this act shall be valid unless it provides 
that the easements shall be used solely for the purposes described in section 1. The instruments 

of 3 34 authorized in said section 1 shall include a reversionary clause that stipulates the easements shall 
terminate, upon such terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset management and 
maintenance may determine, if the property ceases to be used for the express purposes 
authorized in this act. Prior to any reversion, the commissioner shall provide notice of any 
violations to the town of Bourne and the town may cure the violation to the satisfaction of the 
division. If any interest reverts to the commonwealth, any further disposition shall be subject to 
sections 34 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws and the prior approval of the 
general court.